District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-3613

Civil liabilities.

Repealed.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 629, Pub. L. 88-503, § 14
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2613.
1973 Ed., § 2-2413.

Prior Codifications